Hawaii statutes.
§657-15 Two or more disabilities.
Where there are two or more such disabilities existing at the time the right of
action accrued, the limitations herein prescribed shall not attach until all
the disabilities are removed. [CC 1859, §1047; RL 1925, §2650; RL 1935, §3921;
RL 1945, §10432; RL 1955, §241-14; HRS §657-15]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next